Maryland, session 2025, HB0857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–428.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND NOTWITHSTANDING
THE TIME RESTRICTIONS UNDER § 10–410(A) AND (B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON
WHO IS AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO HUNT DEER AND WHO WOUNDS A
DEER DURING LEGAL HUNTING HOURS MAY PURSUE AND KILL THE DEER AFTER
LEGAL HUNTING HOURS.
(B) (1) A SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PERSON
WHO PURSUES A WOUNDED DEER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL USE ONLY THE MEANS AUTHORIZED FOR THE APPLICABLE HUNTING
SEASON OR PERMIT TO KILL THE DEER.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THE RESTRICTIONS UNDER §§ 10–410(E) AND
10–416(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON WHO PURSUES A WOUNDED DEER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY USE A LIGHT OR THROW
OR CAST THE RAYS OF A SPOTLIGHT, A HEADLIGHT, AN ARTIFICIAL LIGHT, A
BATTERY, OR ANY OTHER DEVICE WHILE PURSUING THE WOUNDED DEER.
– 1 –

Ch. 553 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –